North Carolina, session 2025, SB745.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 110-91(7)a. reads as rewritten:
"a. The Commission shall adopt rules for child care centers regarding
staff-child ratios, group sizes and multi-age groupings other than for
infants and toddlers, provided that these rules shall be no less stringent
than those currently required for staff-child ratios as enacted in Section
156(e) of Chapter 757 of the 1985 Session Laws.
1. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the minimum
staff-child ratios and group sizes for infants and toddlers in
child care centers shall be no less stringent than as follows:
Age Ratio Staff/Children Group Size
0 to 12 months 1/5 1015
12 to 24 months 1/6 1218
2 to 3 years 1/10 20.
No child care center shall care for more than 25 children in one
group. Child care centers providing care for 26 or more
children shall provide for two or more groups according to the
ages of children and shall provide separate supervisory
personnel and separate identifiable space for each group.
1a. If a child care center is operating under voluntary enhanced
requirements, the maximum group size for toddlers aged two
to three years may be increased from 18 to 20 children when
the child care center maintains a 1/9 staff-child ratio.
1b. If a child care center is operating under the highest voluntary
enhanced requirements, the child care center may use the
following maximum group sizes for infants and toddlers when
the child care center maintains staff-child ratios as provided
herein:
Age Ratio Staff/Children Group Size
0 to 12 months 1/4 12
12 to 24 months 1/5 15
*S745-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2 to 3 years 1/8 20.
1c. For groups of children one year of age or older, the staff/child
ratio during nap time shall comply with the requirements of
rules adopted by the Commission if (i) at least one person
remains in the room, (ii) all children are visible to that person,
and (iii) the total number of required staff are on the premises
and within calling distance of the rooms occupied by children.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 745-First Edition